Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1535
Legislative declaration; litter and recycling program.

The Legislature declares that the protection of the public health, safety, and well-being, the maintenance of the economic productivity and environmental quality of the state, and the conservation of natural resources require the implementation of a comprehensive litter and recycling program throughout the state and the rapid development of technologically and economically feasible operational projects for the recovery of energy and resources.

Laws 1979, LB 120, § 2.
October 30, 2015